District of Columbia statutes.
32-1124

Applicability.

(a)

Sections 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 through 32-1123, and the repeal of Subchapter I of Chapter 8 of Title 32 shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.

(b)

Rules and standards adopted pursuant to any act repealed or superseded by this chapter shall remain in effect following March 16, 1989, unless replaced or repealed by rules and standards promulgated under this chapter.

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supercede or in any manner affect any worker’s compensation law or to enlarge or diminish the common law or statutory rights, duties, or liabilities of employers and employees with respect to any injury, disease, or death of an employee arising from or in the course of employment.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 26, 35 DCR 8250

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1224.